Nebraska, session 109, LB407.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-1816, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-1816 (1)(a) The accused may be arraigned in county court or
district court:
(i) If the accused was eighteen years of age or older when the
alleged offense was committed;
(ii) If the accused was younger than eighteen years of age and was
sixteen fourteen years of age or older when an alleged offense punishable
as a Class I, IA, IB, IC, ID, II, or IIA felony was committed; or
(iii) If the accused was younger than sixteen years of age and was
thirteen years of age or older when an alleged offense punishable as a
Class I, IA, IB, IC, ID, II, or IIA felony was committed, following a
transfer as provided in section 8 of this act; or
(iv) (iii) If the alleged offense is a traffic offense as defined in
section 43-245.
(b) Arraignment in county court or district court shall be by
reading to the accused the complaint or information, unless the reading
is waived by the accused when the nature of the charge is made known to
him or her. The accused shall then be asked whether he or she is guilty
or not guilty of the offense charged. If the accused appears in person
and by counsel and goes to trial before a jury regularly impaneled and
sworn, he or she shall be deemed to have waived arraignment and a plea of
not guilty shall be deemed to have been made.
(2) At the time of the arraignment, the county court or district
court shall advise the accused, if the accused was younger than eighteen
years of age at the time the alleged offense was committed, that the
accused may move the county court or district court at any time not later
than thirty days after arraignment, unless otherwise permitted by the
court for good cause shown, to waive jurisdiction in such case to the
juvenile court for further proceedings under the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
This subsection does not apply if the case was transferred to county
-2-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
court or district court from juvenile court.
(3) For motions to transfer a case from the county court or district
court to juvenile court:
(a) The county court or district court shall schedule a hearing on
such motion within fifteen days. The customary rules of evidence shall
not be followed at such hearing. The accused shall be represented by an
attorney. The criteria set forth in section 43-276 shall be considered at
such hearing. After considering all the evidence and reasons presented by
both parties, the case shall be transferred to juvenile court unless a
sound basis exists for retaining the case in county court or district
court; and
(b) The county court or district court shall make a decision on such
motion within thirty days after the hearing and shall set forth findings
for the reason for its decision. If the county court or district court
determines that the accused should be transferred to the juvenile court,
the complete file in the county court or district court shall be
transferred to the juvenile court and the complaint, indictment, or
information may be used in place of a petition therein. The county court
or district court making a transfer shall order the accused to be taken
forthwith to the juvenile court and designate where the juvenile shall be
kept pending determination by the juvenile court. The juvenile court
shall then proceed as provided in the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(4) An order granting or denying transfer of the case from county
court or district court to juvenile court shall be considered a final
order for the purposes of appeal. Upon entry of an order, any party may
appeal to the Court of Appeals within ten days. Such review shall be
advanced on the court docket without an extension of time granted to any
party except upon a showing of exceptional cause. Appeals shall be
submitted, assigned, and scheduled for oral argument as soon as the
appellee's brief is due to be filed. The Court of Appeals shall conduct
its review in an expedited manner and shall render the judgment and
-3-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
opinion, if any, as speedily as possible. During the pendency of an
appeal from an order transferring the case to juvenile court, the
juvenile court may enter temporary orders in the best interests of the
juvenile.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(b) of this section, any
admission, confession, or statement made by the accused to a
psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist, or licensed mental health
practitioner for purposes of a motion to transfer a case from county
court or district court to juvenile court shall be inadmissible in any
criminal or civil proceeding.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) of this section does not prevent any such
admission, confession, or statement from being:
(i) Admissible in proceedings relating to such motion to transfer;
(ii) Admissible in disposition proceedings of such accused under the
Nebraska Juvenile Code if the case is transferred to juvenile court;
(iii) Included in any presentence investigation report for such
accused if the case is not transferred to juvenile court; and
(iv) Admissible in such case to impeach such accused during cross-
examination if the accused testifies at trial or during juvenile court
proceedings and such testimony is materially inconsistent with a prior
statement made by the accused to a psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist,
or licensed mental health practitioner for purposes of the motion to
transfer such case.
(6) When the accused was younger than eighteen years of age when an
alleged offense was committed, the county attorney or city attorney shall
proceed under section 43-274.
Sec. 2. Section 43-246.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-246.01 (1) The juvenile court shall have exclusive original
jurisdiction as to:
(a) Any juvenile described in subdivision (3) or (11) of section
-4-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
43-247;
(b) Any juvenile who was under sixteen years of age at the time the
alleged offense was committed and the offense falls under subdivision (1)
of section 43-247;
(c) A party or proceeding described in subdivision (5) or (7) of
section 43-247; and
(d) Any juvenile who was under sixteen fourteen years of age at the
time the alleged offense was committed and the offense falls under
subdivision (2) of section 43-247.
(2)(a) The juvenile court shall also have exclusive original
jurisdiction as to:
(i) Any juvenile who is alleged to have committed an offense under
subdivision (1) of section 43-247 and who was sixteen years of age or
seventeen years of age at the time the alleged offense was committed; and
(ii) Any juvenile who was sixteen fourteen years of age or older at
the time the alleged offense was committed and the offense falls under
subdivision (2) of section 43-247 except offenses enumerated in
subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of section 29-1816.
(b) Proceedings initiated under this subsection (2) of this section
may be transferred as provided in section 43-274.
(3)(a) The juvenile court shall also have exclusive original
jurisdiction as to any juvenile who was thirteen years of age or older
but less than sixteen years of age at the time the alleged offense was
committed and the offense is enumerated in subdivision (1)(a)(iii) of
section 29-1816.
(b) Proceedings initiated under this subsection may be transferred
as provided in section 8 of this act.
(4)(a) (3)(a) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original
jurisdiction with the county court or district court as to:
(i) Any juvenile described in subdivision (4) of section 43-247;
(ii) Any proceeding under subdivision (6), (8), (9), or (10) of
-5-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
section 43-247; and
(iii) Any juvenile described in subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of section
29-1816.
(b) Proceedings initiated under this subsection (3) of this section
may be transferred as provided in section 43-274.
Sec. 3. Section 43-251.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-251.01 All placements and commitments of juveniles for
evaluations or as temporary or final dispositions are subject to the
following:
(1) No juvenile shall be confined in an adult correctional facility
as a disposition of the court;
(2) A juvenile who is found to be a juvenile as described in
subdivision (3) of section 43-247 shall not be placed in an adult
correctional facility, the secure youth confinement facility operated by
the Department of Correctional Services, or a youth rehabilitation and
treatment center or committed to the Office of Juvenile Services;
(3) A juvenile who is found to be a juvenile as described in
subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of section 43-247 shall not be assigned or
transferred to an adult correctional facility or the secure youth
confinement facility operated by the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) A juvenile under the age of fourteen years shall not be placed
with or committed to a youth rehabilitation and treatment center, except
for a juvenile described in subdivision (1)(a)(iii) of section 29-1816;
(5)(a) A juvenile shall not be detained unless the physical safety
of persons in the community would be seriously threatened or detention is
necessary to secure the presence of the juvenile at the next hearing, as
evidenced by a demonstrable record of willful failure to appear at a
scheduled court hearing within the last twelve months;
(b) A child twelve years of age or younger shall not be placed in
detention under any circumstances; and
-6-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
(c) A juvenile shall not be placed into detention:
(i) To allow a parent or guardian to avoid his or her legal
responsibility;
(ii) To punish, treat, or rehabilitate such juvenile;
(iii) To permit more convenient administrative access to such
juvenile;
(iv) To facilitate further interrogation or investigation; or
(v) Due to a lack of more appropriate facilities except in case of
an emergency as provided in section 43-430;
(6) A juvenile alleged to be a juvenile as described in subdivision
(3) of section 43-247 shall not be placed in a juvenile detention
facility, including a wing labeled as staff secure at such facility,
unless the designated staff secure portion of the facility fully complies
with subdivision (5) of section 83-4,125 and the ingress and egress to
the facility are restricted solely through staff supervision; and
(7) A juvenile alleged to be a juvenile as described in subdivision
(1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 shall not be placed out of his
or her home as a dispositional order of the court unless:
(a) All available community-based resources have been exhausted to
assist the juvenile and his or her family; and
(b) Maintaining the juvenile in the home presents a significant risk
of harm to the juvenile or community.
Sec. 4. Section 43-252, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-252 (1) The fingerprints of any juvenile less than fourteen years
of age, except for a juvenile described in subdivision (1)(a)(iii) of
section 29-1816, who has been taken into custody in the investigation of
a suspected unlawful act, shall not be taken unless the consent of any
district, county, associate county, associate separate juvenile court, or
separate juvenile court judge has first been obtained.
(2) The fingerprints of any juvenile alleged or found to be a
-7-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
juvenile as described in subdivision (3)(b) of section 43-247 shall not
be taken.
(3) If the judge permits the fingerprinting, the fingerprints must
be filed by law enforcement officers in files kept separate from those of
persons of the age of majority.
(4) The fingerprints of any juvenile shall not be sent to a state or
federal depository by a law enforcement agency of this state unless: (a)
The juvenile has been convicted of or adjudged to have committed a
felony; (b) the juvenile has unlawfully terminated his or her commitment
to a youth rehabilitation and treatment center; or (c) the juvenile is a
runaway and a fingerprint check is needed for identification purposes to
return the juvenile to his or her parent.
Sec. 5. Section 43-276, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-276 (1) The county attorney or city attorney, in making the
determination whether to file a criminal charge, file a juvenile court
petition, offer juvenile pretrial diversion or restorative justice, or
transfer a case to or from juvenile court, and the juvenile court, county
court, or district court in making the determination whether to transfer
a case, shall consider: (a) The type of treatment such juvenile would
most likely be amenable to; (b) whether there is evidence that the
alleged offense included violence; (c) the motivation for the commission
of the offense; (d) the age of the juvenile and the ages and
circumstances of any others involved in the offense; (e) the previous
history of the juvenile, including whether he or she had been convicted
of any previous offenses or adjudicated in juvenile court; (f) the best
interests of the juvenile; (g) consideration of public safety; (h)
consideration of the juvenile's ability to appreciate the nature and
seriousness of his or her conduct; (i) whether the best interests of the
juvenile and the security of the public may require that the juvenile
continue in secure detention or under supervision for a period extending
-8-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
beyond his or her minority and, if so, the available alternatives best
suited to this purpose; (j) whether the victim or juvenile agree to
participate in restorative justice; (k) whether there is a juvenile
pretrial diversion program established pursuant to sections 43-260.02 to
43-260.07; (l) whether the juvenile has been convicted of or has
acknowledged unauthorized use or possession of a firearm; (m) whether a
juvenile court order has been issued for the juvenile pursuant to section
43-2,106.03 or section 8 of this act; (n) whether the juvenile is a
criminal street gang member; and (o) such other matters as the parties
deem relevant to aid in the decision.
(2) Prior to filing a petition alleging that a juvenile is a
juvenile as described in subdivision (3)(b) of section 43-247, the county
attorney shall make reasonable efforts to refer the juvenile and family
to community-based resources available to address the juvenile's
behaviors, provide crisis intervention, and maintain the juvenile safely
in the home. Failure to describe the efforts required by this subsection
shall be a defense to adjudication.
Sec. 6. Section 43-279, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-279 (1) The adjudication portion of hearings shall be conducted
before the court without a jury, applying the customary rules of evidence
in use in trials without a jury. When the petition alleges the juvenile
to be within the provisions of subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of
section 43-247 and the juvenile or his or her parent, guardian, or
custodian appears with or without counsel, the court shall inform the
parties:
(a) Of the nature of the proceedings and the possible consequences
or dispositions pursuant to sections 43-284 to 43-286, 43-289, and 43-290
and section 8 of this act that may apply to the juvenile's case following
an adjudication of jurisdiction;
(b) Of such juvenile's right to counsel as provided in sections
-9-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
43-272 and 43-273;
(c) Of the privilege against self-incrimination by advising the
juvenile, parent, guardian, or custodian that the juvenile may remain
silent concerning the charges against the juvenile and that anything said
may be used against the juvenile;
(d) Of the right to confront anyone who testifies against the
juvenile and to cross-examine any persons who appear against the
juvenile;
(e) Of the right of the juvenile to testify and to compel other
witnesses to attend and testify in his or her own behalf;
(f) Of the right of the juvenile to a speedy adjudication hearing;
and
(g) Of the right to appeal and have a transcript for such purpose.
After giving such warnings and admonitions, the court may accept an
in-court admission or answer of no contest by the juvenile of all or any
part of the allegations in the petition if the court has determined from
examination of the juvenile and those present that such admission or
answer of no contest is intelligently, voluntarily, and understandingly
made and with an affirmative waiver of rights and that a factual basis
for such admission or answer of no contest exists. The waiver of the
right to counsel shall satisfy section 43-3102. The court may base its
adjudication provided in subsection (2) of this section on such admission
or answer of no contest.
(2) If the juvenile denies the petition or stands mute the court
shall first allow a reasonable time for preparation if needed and then
consider only the question of whether the juvenile is a person described
by section 43-247. After hearing the evidence on such question, the court
shall make a finding and adjudication, to be entered on the records of
the court, whether or not the juvenile is a person described by
subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 based upon proof
beyond a reasonable doubt. If an Indian child is involved, the standard
-10-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
of proof shall be in compliance with the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare
Act, if applicable.
(3) If the court shall find that the juvenile named in the petition
is not within the provisions of section 43-247, it shall dismiss the
case. If the court finds that the juvenile named in the petition is such
a juvenile, it shall make and enter its findings and adjudication
accordingly, designating which subdivision or subdivisions of section
43-247 such juvenile is within; the court shall allow a reasonable time
for preparation if needed and then proceed to an inquiry into the proper
disposition to be made of such juvenile.
Sec. 7. Section 43-286, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-286 (1) When any juvenile is adjudicated to be a juvenile
described in subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of section 43-247:
(a) The court may continue the dispositional portion of the hearing,
from time to time upon such terms and conditions as the court may
prescribe, including an order of restitution of any property stolen or
damaged or an order requiring the juvenile to participate in restorative
justice programs or community service programs, if such order is in the
interest of the juvenile's reformation or rehabilitation, and, subject to
the further order of the court, may:
(i) Place the juvenile on probation subject to the supervision of a
probation officer; or
(ii) Permit the juvenile to remain in his or her own home or be
placed in a suitable family home or institution, subject to the
supervision of the probation officer;
(b) When it is alleged that the juvenile has exhausted all levels of
probation supervision and options for community-based services and
section 43-251.01 has been satisfied, a motion for commitment to a youth
rehabilitation and treatment center may be filed and proceedings held as
follows:
-11-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
(i) The motion shall set forth specific factual allegations that
support the motion and a copy of such motion shall be served on all
persons required to be served by sections 43-262 to 43-267;
(ii) The Office of Juvenile Services shall be served with a copy of
such motion and shall be a party to the case for all matters related to
the juvenile's commitment to, placement with, or discharge from the
Office of Juvenile Services; and
(iii) The juvenile shall be entitled to a hearing before the court
to determine the validity of the allegations. At such hearing the burden
is upon the state by a preponderance of the evidence to show that:
(A) All levels of probation supervision have been exhausted;
(B) All options for community-based services have been exhausted;
and
(C) Placement at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center is a
matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the
juvenile or the person or property of another or if it appears that such
juvenile is likely to flee the jurisdiction of the court;
(c) After the hearing, the court may, as a condition of an order of
intensive supervised probation, commit such juvenile to the Office of
Juvenile Services for placement at a youth rehabilitation and treatment
center operated in compliance with state law. Upon commitment by the
court to the Office of Juvenile Services, the court shall immediately
notify the Office of Juvenile Services of the commitment. Intensive
supervised probation for purposes of this subdivision means that the
Office of Juvenile Services shall be responsible for the care and custody
of the juvenile until the Office of Juvenile Services discharges the
juvenile from commitment to the Office of Juvenile Services. Upon
discharge of the juvenile, the court shall hold a review hearing on the
conditions of probation and enter any order allowed under subdivision (1)
(a) of this section;
(d) The Office of Juvenile Services shall notify those required to
-12-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
be served by sections 43-262 to 43-267, all interested parties, and the
committing court of the pending discharge of a juvenile from the youth
rehabilitation and treatment center sixty days prior to discharge and
again in every case not less than thirty days prior to discharge. Upon
notice of pending discharge by the Office of Juvenile Services, the court
shall set a continued disposition hearing in anticipation of reentry. The
Office of Juvenile Services shall work in collaboration with the Office
of Probation Administration in developing an individualized reentry plan
for the juvenile as provided in section 43-425. The Office of Juvenile
Services shall provide a copy of the individualized reentry plan to the
juvenile, the juvenile's attorney, and the county attorney or city
attorney prior to the continued disposition hearing. At the continued
disposition hearing, the court shall review and approve or modify the
individualized reentry plan, place the juvenile under probation
supervision, and enter any other order allowed by law. No hearing is
required if all interested parties stipulate to the individualized
reentry plan by signed motion. In such a case, the court shall approve
the conditions of probation, approve the individualized reentry plan, and
place the juvenile under probation supervision; and
(e) The Office of Juvenile Services is responsible for
transportation of the juvenile to and from the youth rehabilitation and
treatment center. The Office of Juvenile Services may contract for such
services. A plan for a juvenile's transport to return to the community
shall be a part of the individualized reentry plan. The Office of
Juvenile Services may approve family to provide such transport when
specified in the individualized reentry plan.
(2) When any juvenile is found by the court to be a juvenile
described in subdivision (3)(b) of section 43-247, the court may enter
such order as it is empowered to enter under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section.
(3) When any juvenile is adjudicated to be a juvenile described in
-13-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247, the court may
order the juvenile to be assessed for referral to participate in a
restorative justice program. Factors that the judge may consider for such
referral include, but are not limited to: The juvenile's age,
intellectual capacity, and living environment; the ages of others who
were part of the offense; the age and capacity of the victim; and the
nature of the case.
(4) When a juvenile is placed on probation and a probation officer
has reasonable cause to believe that such juvenile has committed a
violation of a condition of his or her probation, the probation officer
shall take appropriate measures as provided in section 43-286.01.
(5)(a) When a juvenile is placed on probation or under the
supervision of the court and it is alleged that the juvenile is again a
juvenile described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section
43-247, a petition may be filed and the same procedure followed and
rights given at a hearing on the original petition. If an adjudication is
made that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may make
any disposition authorized by this section for such adjudications and the
county attorney may file a motion to revoke the juvenile's probation.
(b) When a juvenile is placed on probation or under the supervision
of the court for conduct under subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of
section 43-247 and it is alleged that the juvenile has violated a term of
probation or supervision or that the juvenile has violated an order of
the court, a motion to revoke probation or supervision or to change the
disposition may be filed and proceedings held as follows:
(i) The motion shall set forth specific factual allegations of the
alleged violations and a copy of such motion shall be served on all
persons required to be served by sections 43-262 to 43-267;
(ii) The juvenile shall be entitled to a hearing before the court to
determine the validity of the allegations. At such hearing the juvenile
shall be entitled to those rights relating to counsel provided by section
-14-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
43-272 and those rights relating to detention provided by sections 43-254
to 43-256. The juvenile shall also be entitled to speak and present
documents, witnesses, or other evidence on his or her own behalf. He or
she may confront persons who have given adverse information concerning
the alleged violations, may cross-examine such persons, and may show that
he or she did not violate the conditions of his or her probation or
supervision or an order of the court or, if he or she did, that
mitigating circumstances suggest that the violation does not warrant
revocation of probation or supervision or a change of disposition. The
hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after the juvenile is
taken into custody;
(iii) The hearing shall be conducted in an informal manner and shall
be flexible enough to consider evidence, including letters, affidavits,
and other material, that would not be admissible in an adversarial
criminal trial;
(iv) The juvenile shall not be confined, detained, or otherwise
significantly deprived of his or her liberty pursuant to the filing of a
motion described in this section unless the requirements of subdivision
(5) of section 43-251.01 and section 43-260.01 have been met. In all
cases when the requirements of subdivision (5) of section 43-251.01 and
section 43-260.01 have been met and the juvenile is confined, detained,
or otherwise significantly deprived of his or her liberty as a result of
his or her alleged violation of probation, supervision, or a court order,
the juvenile shall be given a preliminary hearing. If, as a result of
such preliminary hearing, probable cause is found to exist, the juvenile
shall be entitled to a hearing before the court in accordance with this
subsection;
(v) If the juvenile is found by the court to have violated the terms
of his or her probation or supervision or an order of the court, the
court may modify the terms and conditions of the probation, supervision,
or other court order, extend the period of probation, supervision, or
-15-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
other court order, or enter any order of disposition that could have been
made at the time the original order was entered; and
(vi) In cases when the court revokes probation, supervision, or
other court order, it shall enter a written statement as to the evidence
relied on and the reasons for revocation.
(6)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (6)(b) of this section and
section 8 of this act, the court shall not change a disposition unless
the court finds that the juvenile has violated a term or condition of
probation or supervision or an order of the court and the procedures in
subdivision (5)(b) of this section have been satisfied.
(b) Upon motion of the juvenile, the court may modify the terms or
conditions of probation or supervision or modify a dispositional order
if:
(i) All parties stipulate to the particular modification; and
(ii) The juvenile has consulted with counsel or has waived counsel.
Any waiver must be particular to the modification and shall comply with
section 43-3102.
(7) Costs incurred on behalf of a juvenile under this section shall
be paid as provided in section 43-290.01.
(8) When any juvenile is adjudicated to be a juvenile described in
subdivision (4) of section 43-247, the juvenile court shall within thirty
days of adjudication transmit to the Director of Motor Vehicles an
abstract of the court record of adjudication.
Sec. 8. (1) At any time after the disposition of a juvenile
described in subdivision (1)(a)(iii) of section 29-1816, the county
attorney may file a motion requesting the juvenile court to dismiss the
petition and authorize the county attorney to refile any charges
described in such subdivision as a criminal proceeding in district court.
(2)(a) The juvenile court shall schedule a hearing on such motion
within fifteen days after the motion is filed.
(b) The juvenile shall be represented by counsel at the hearing and
-16-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
may present the evidence as to why the proceeding should be retained.
(c) After considering all the evidence and reasons presented by both
parties, the juvenile court shall retain the proceeding unless the court
determines that the county attorney has shown, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the juvenile is not amenable to rehabilitation under the
Nebraska Juvenile Code and that a criminal proceeding would be more
appropriate.
(d) The juvenile court shall make a decision on the motion within
thirty days after the hearing. The juvenile court shall set forth
findings for the reason for its decision.
(3) An order granting or denying a motion under this section shall
be considered a final order for the purposes of appeal. Upon the entry of
an order, any party may appeal to the Court of Appeals within ten days.
Such review shall be advanced on the court docket without an extension of
time granted to any party except upon a showing of exceptional cause.
Appeals shall be submitted, assigned, and scheduled for oral argument as
soon as the appellee's brief is due to be filed. The Court of Appeals
shall conduct its review in an expedited manner and shall render the
judgment and opinion, if any, as speedily as possible. During the
pendency of any such appeal, the juvenile court may continue to enter
temporary orders in the best interests of the juvenile pursuant to
section 43-295.
(4) If the motion is granted, the county attorney or city attorney
shall file a criminal information in the district court and the juvenile
shall be arraigned as provided for a person eighteen years of age or
older in subdivision (1)(b) of section 29-1816.
(5) If a motion under this section is granted, any statute of
limitations for an offense described in subdivision (1)(a)(iii) of
section 29-1816, including a statute of limitations which would otherwise
have expired, shall be extended until the later of:
(a) One year after the date the motion to transfer is granted; or
-17-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
(b) One year after entry of final judgment in an appeal concerning
the motion to transfer.
(6) An order under this section shall be considered by the county
attorney in making a future determination under section 43-276 regarding
such juvenile and by the court when considering a future transfer motion
under section 29-1816 or 43-274 or this section or any future charge or
petition regarding such juvenile.
(7)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (7)(b) of this section, any
admission, confession, or statement made by the juvenile in a proceeding
under this section shall be inadmissible in any criminal or civil
proceeding.
(b) This subsection does not prevent any such admission, confession,
or statement from being:
(i) Admissible in proceedings relating to the motion under this
section;
(ii) Admissible in any subsequent proceedings for such juvenile
under the Nebraska Juvenile Code if the case is not transferred to
district court;
(iii) Included in any presentence investigation report for such
juvenile if the case is transferred to district court; and
(iv) Admissible in such case to impeach such juvenile during cross-
examination if the juvenile testifies at trial or during juvenile court
proceedings and such testimony is materially inconsistent with the
admission, confession, or statement.
Sec. 9. Section 43-2,106.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
43-2,106.03 Any time after the disposition of a juvenile described
in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247, upon the
motion of any party or the court on its own motion, a hearing may be held
regarding the amenability of the juvenile to the rehabilitative services
that can be provided under the Nebraska Juvenile Code. The court may
-18-

LB407 LB407
2025 2025
enter an order, based upon evidence presented at the hearing, finding
that a juvenile is not amenable to rehabilitative services that can be
provided under the Nebraska Juvenile Code. The reasons for such a finding
shall be stated in the order. Such an order shall be considered by the
county attorney in making a future determination under section 43-276
regarding such juvenile and by the court when considering a future
transfer motion under section 29-1816 or 43-274 or section 8 of this act
or any future charge or petition regarding such juvenile.
Sec. 10. Section 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2,129 Sections 43-245 to 43-2,129 and section 8 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
Sec. 11. Section 43-424, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-424 If a juvenile assaults an employee of a youth rehabilitation
and treatment center or another juvenile who has been committed to the
youth rehabilitation and treatment center or escapes or attempts to
escape from a youth rehabilitation and treatment center, the chief
executive officer of the youth rehabilitation and treatment center shall
document the assault, escape, or attempt to escape and send a copy of
such documentation to the committing court and the county attorney of the
county in which the committing court is located as soon as possible after
the determination that such assault, escape, or attempt to escape has
occurred. Such documentation may be offered as evidence presented at any
hearing conducted pursuant to section 43-2,106.03 or section 8 of this
act.
Sec. 12. Original sections 43-252, 43-2,106.03, and 43-424, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 29-1816, 43-246.01, 43-251.01,
43-276, 43-279, 43-286, and 43-2,129, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-19-